sl-SI: Oblika žive vabe: Mrtva; Posušena; Zamrznjena; Tekoča; Živa; Pasta; Briket; V prahu; Konzervirana; Soljena; Drugo
zh-CN: 活饵形态: 死饵; 干饵; 冷冻饵; 液体诱饵; 活饵; 膏状饵; 颗粒饵; 粉末饵; 防腐处理饵; 盐渍饵; 其他
th: รูปแบบเหยื่อสด: ตาย; แห้ง; แช่แข็ง; ของเหลว; เป็น; แบบนวด; เม็ด; ผง; ถนอมอาหาร; หมักเกลือ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oblik živog mamca: Mrtav; Sušen; Smrznut; Tekućina; Živ; Pasta; Peleti; Prah; Konzerviran; Posoljen; Ostalo
cs: Živá návnada: Mrtvá; Sušená; Mražená; Tekutá; Živá; Pasta; Peleta; Prášek; Konzervovaná; Solená; Jiné
zh-TW: 活餌形式: 死餌; 乾燥; 冷凍; 液體; 活餌; 膏狀; 顆粒; 粉末; 醃製; 鹽漬; 其他
pl: Forma żywej przynęty: Martwa; Suszona; Mrożona; Płynna; Żywa; Pasta; Pellet; Proszek; Konserwowana; Solona; Inne
sk-SK: Forma živej návnady: Mŕtva; Sušená; Mrazená; Tekutá; Živá; Pasta; Pelety; Prášok; Konzervovaná; Solená; Iné
ru: Форма живой наживки: Мертвая; Сушеная; Замороженная; Жидкая; Живая; Паста; Гранулы; Порошок; Консервированная; Соленая; Другое
it: Forma di esca viva: Morto; Essiccato; Congelato; Liquido; Vivo; Pasta; Pellet; Polvere; Conservato; Sotto sale; Altro
ja: 生餌: デッドベイト; 乾燥; 冷凍; 液体; 生き餌; 練り餌; ペレット; 粉末; 保存; 塩漬け; その他
ko: 생 미끼 형태: 죽은 미끼; 건조 미끼; 냉동 미끼; 액체 미끼; 생미끼; 페이스트 미끼; 펠릿 미끼; 분말 미끼; 보존 미끼; 염장 미끼; 기타
fr: Forme de l’appât vivant: Mort; Séché; Congelé; Liquide; Vivant; Pâte; Granulé; Poudre; Conservé; Salé; Autre
de: Form des Lebendköders: Tot; Getrocknet; Gefroren; Flüssig; Lebend; Paste; Pellets; Pulver; Konserviert; Gesalzen; Sonstige
nl: Levend aas vorm: Dood; Gedroogd; Diepvries; Vloeibaar; Levend; Pasta; Pellet; Poeder; Geconserveerd; Gezouten; Overige
pt-BR: Isca viva forma: Morto; Desidratado; Congelado; Líquido; Vivo; Massa; Pellet; Pó; Preservado; Salgado; Outro
lt-LT: Gyvo masalo forma: Negyvas; Džiovintas; Šaldytas; Skystas; Gyvas; Pasta; Granulė; Milteliai; Konservuotas; Sūdytas; Kita
tr: Canlı yem formu: Ölü; Kurutulmuş; Dondurulmuş; Sıvı; Canlı; Macun; Pelet; Toz; Muhafaza edilmiş; Tuzlanmış; Diğer
fi: Elävän syötin olomuoto: Kuollut; Kuivattu; Pakastettu; Neste; Elävä; Tahna; Pelletti; Jauhe; Säilötty; Suolattu; Muu
es: Forma del cebo vivo: Muerto; Seco; Congelado; Líquido; Vivo; Pasta; Gránulo; Polvo; Conservado; Salado; Otro
nb: Form til levende agn: Død; Tørket; Frossen; Flytende; Levende; Pasta; Pellets; Pulver; Konservert; Saltet; Annet
pt-PT: Estado do isco vivo: Morto; Seco; Congelado; Líquido; Vivo; Pasta; Granulado; Pó; Conservado; Salgado; Outro
bg-BG: Форма на жива стръв: Мъртва; Сушена; Замразена; Течност; Жива; Паста; Пелета; Прах; Консервирана; Осолена; Други
sv: Form för levande bete: Dött; Torkat; Fryst; Flytande; Levande; Pasta; Pellets; Pulver; Konserverat; Saltat; Övrigt
da: Levende agntype: Død; Tørret; Frossen; Flydende; Levende; Pasta; Pille; Pulver; Konserveret; Saltet; Andet
hu: Élő csali formája: Élettelen; Szárított; Fagyasztott; Folyékony; Élő; Paszta; Pellet; Por; Tartósított; Sózott; Egyéb
ro-RO: Formă momeală vie: Mort; Uscat; Congelat; Lichid; Viu; Pastă; Pelete; Pulbere; Conservat; Sărat; Altele
en: Live bait form: Dead; Dried; Frozen; Liquid; Live; Paste; Pellet; Powder; Preserved; Salted; Other
el: Μορφή ζωντανού δολώματος: Νεκρό; Αποξηραμένο; Κατεψυγμένο; Υγρό; Ζωντανό; Πάστα; Πέλετ; Σκόνη; Διατηρημένο; Παστό; Άλλο
vi: Dạng mồi sống: Chết; Khô; Đông lạnh; Dạng lỏng; Sống; Dạng nhão; Dạng viên; Dạng bột; Ngâm tẩm; Ướp muối; Khác